Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska66-1807
Commission; powers; how construed.

Except as otherwise provided in the State Natural Gas Regulation Act, all orders, rules, regulations, practices, services, rates, charges, classifications, and tolls fixed by the commission shall be prima facie reasonable unless or until changed or modified by the commission or in pursuance of proceedings instituted in court as provided in the act.

Laws 2003, LB 790, § 7.